Colorado statutes. TITLE 3 United States
ARTICLE 2
JURISDICTION RESERVED BY STATE

Section

3-2-101. State jurisdiction over Indian reservations and federally controlled properties for school district purposes.

The state of Colorado hereby accepts jurisdiction over the territory of all Indian reservations, which is situated within the state, for the purpose of such territory, or any portion thereof, being included within one or more school districts and local college districts. The state of Colorado hereby reserves jurisdiction over all federally owned or controlled territory within the state, in all instances wherein such reserved jurisdiction may be so construed in accordance with the terms of the grants or agreements heretofore or hereafter made to or with the federal government, for the purpose of such territory, or any portion thereof, being included within one or more school districts and local college districts.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 979, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 143-2-1.